District of Columbia statutes.
1-1163.11

Specific requirements for statements of organization filed by political committees.

In addition to the statement of organization set forth in § 1-1163.07, each political committee, political action committee, and independent expenditure committee shall also file the following information with the Director of Campaign Finance within 10 days after the political committee's organization:

(1)

The names, addresses, and relationships of affiliated or connected organizations;

(2)

The area, scope, or jurisdiction of the political committee;

(3)

The name, address, office sought, and party affiliation of:

(A)

Each candidate whom the committee is supporting; and

(B)

Any other individual, if any, whom the committee is supporting for nomination for election or election, to any public office whatever; or, if the committee is supporting the entire ticket of any party, the name of the party; or, if the committee is supporting or opposing any initiative or referendum, the summary statement and short title of the initiative or referendum, prepared in accordance with § 1-1001.16; or, if the committee is supporting or opposing any recall measure, the name and office of the public official whose recall is sought or opposed in accordance with § 1-1001.17;

(4)

A statement whether the political committee is a continuing one; and

(5)

The disposition of residual funds which will be made in the event of dissolution.

Apr. 27, 2012, D.C. Law 19-124, § 311, 59 DCR 1862
Feb. 22, 2014, D.C. Law 20-79, § 2(j), 61 DCR 153

Applicability of D.C. Law 20-79: Section 3 of D.C. Law 20-79 provided that the act shall apply upon the latest of: (1) The inclusion of the fiscal effect of the act in an approved budget and financial plan, as certified by the Chief Financial Officer to the Budget Director of the Council in a certification published by the Council in the District of Columbia Register; or (2) January 31, 2015.

A certification dated February 4, 2015, that the fiscal effect of the Campaign Finance Reform and Transparency Amendment Act of 2013, D.C. Law 20-79, has been included in an approved budget and financial plan was published in the D.C. Register on March 13, 2015 (62 DCR 2988).

The 2014 amendment by D.C. Law 20-79 added “political action committee, and independent expenditure committee” in the introductory language; and deleted “political” preceding “committee” in (2) and (4).